Tennessee, session 114, HB1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 42, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a)
(1) A public airport that provides commercial services shall not enter into
or renew an agreement that authorizes a private third-party vendor that provides
expedited security screening to use the standard security lane or the
transportation security administration PreCheck security lane.
(2) For agreements entered into before July 1, 2025, this section applies
upon the expiration of the existing agreement.
(b) This section does not apply to an agreement between a public airport and a
private third-party vendor if the private third-party vendor has obtained dedicated
transportation security administration security lanes solely for use by the private third-
party vendor at that public airport.
(c) For purposes of this section, an airline, as certified under Title 14 of the Code
of Federal Regulations Part 121, is not a private third-party vendor. This section does
not apply to any services, including priority lanes or lines, offered by an airline solely for
use by the airline's passengers, without a separate charge to a passenger by a private
third-party vendor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1211
001861
- 1 -